tr: Yakıt enjeksiyonu temizleme yöntemi: Doğrudan enjektör temizliği (tezgah/ultrasonik/adaptör tabanlı); Depo içi katkı (dökme); Çoklu yöntem; Basınçlı ray/hat temizliği (servis kutusu); Gaz kelebeği/emme manifoldu temizliği; Diğer
fi: Polttoaineen ruiskutusjärjestelmän puhdistusmenetelmä: Suuttimien suorapuhdistus (penkki/ultraääni/adapteri); Tankkiin lisättävä lisäaine (kaadettava); Monimenetelmä; Paineistettu kiskon/linjan puhdistus (huoltosäiliö); Kaasuläppäkotelon/imusarjan puhdistus; Muu
pl: Metoda czyszczenia wtrysku paliwa: Bezpośrednie czyszczenie wtryskiwaczy (stół probierczy/ultradźwięki/z adapterem); Dodatek do zbiornika paliwa (wlewany); Metoda mieszana; Czyszczenie szyny/przewodu pod ciśnieniem (puszka serwisowa); Czyszczenie przepustnicy/układu dolotowego; Inna
sv: Rengöringsmetod för bränsleinsprutningssystem: Rengöring av direkta injektorer (bänk/ultraljud/adapterbaserad); Tillsats i tanken (häll i); Flermetods; Trycksatt rail/ledningsrengöring (servicebehållare); Rengöring av spjällhus/insug; Övrigt
hu: Üzemanyag-befecskendező tisztítási mód: Közvetlen injektortisztítás (próbapad/ultrahang/adapter); Üzemanyag-adalék (tartályba önthető); Többféle módszer; Nyomás alatti sín/cső tisztítás (szerviztartállyal); Fojtószelep/szívósor tisztítás; Egyéb
ro-RO: Metoda de curățare a injecției de combustibil: Curățarea directă a injectoarelor (pe banc/ultrasunete/cu adaptor); Aditiv pentru rezervor (turnare); Metodă multiplă; Curățarea conductei/rampei sub presiune (recipient de service); Curățarea corpului de accelerație/admisiei; Altele
da: Metode til rensning af brændstofindsprøjtningssystem: Rensning af direkte indsprøjtning (bænk/ultralyd/adapterbaseret); Additiv i tank (hældes i); Flere metoder; Rensning af rør/slange under tryk (servicebeholder); Rensning af spjældhus/indsugning; Andet
es: Método de limpieza para inyección de combustible: Limpieza directa del inyector (banco/ultrasonido/con adaptador); Aditivo para el tanque (líquido); Método múltiple; Limpieza de riel/línea a presión (cartucho de servicio); Limpieza del cuerpo del acelerador/admisión; Otro
ja: 燃料噴射洗浄方法: ダイレクトインジェクタークリーニング (ベンチ/超音波/アダプター式); タンク内添加剤 (注入式); マルチメソッド; 加圧レール/ラインクリーニング (サービスクキャニスター); スロットルボディ/インテーククリーニング; その他
el: Μέθοδος καθαρισμού ψεκασμού καυσίμου: Άμεσος καθαρισμός μπεκ (πάγκος/υπέρηχοι/βάσει προσαρμογέα); Πρόσθετο ρεζερβουάρ (υγρό); Πολλαπλές μέθοδοι; Καθαρισμός γραμμής/αυλού υπό πίεση (δοχείο σέρβις); Καθαρισμός πεταλούδας γκαζιού/εισαγωγής; Άλλο
hr-HR: Metoda čišćenja ubrizgavanja goriva: Čišćenje izravnih injektora (stolni aparat / ultrazvuk / s adapterima); Aditiv za spremnik (ulijevanje); Više metoda; Čišćenje voda pod tlakom (servisni spremnik); Čišćenje kućišta leptira / usisa; Ostalo
sk-SK: Metóda čistenia vstrekovania paliva: Priame čistenie vstrekovačov (stolica/ultrazvuk/adaptér); Prísada do nádrže (nalievacia); Kombinovaná metóda; Čistenie natlakovanej lišty/vedenia (servisná nádoba); Čistenie škrtiacej klapky/sania; Iné
cs: Způsob čištění vstřiků: Čištění přímého vstřikování (na stolici / ultrazvukové / s adaptérem); Aditivum do nádrže (nalévací); Kombinovaná metoda; Tlakové čištění lišty/potrubí (servisní nádoba); Čištění škrticí klapky / sání; Ostatní
pt-PT: método de limpeza do sistema de injeção de combustível: Limpeza de injetores diretos (bancada/ultrassónica/por adaptador); Aditivo de tanque (deitar); Multimétodo; Limpeza de calha/linha pressurizada (recipiente de serviço); Limpeza de corpo da borboleta/admissão; Outro
vi: Phương pháp làm sạch hệ thống phun nhiên liệu: Làm sạch kim phun trực tiếp (trên bàn/sóng siêu âm/dùng bộ chuyển đổi); Phụ gia trong bình nhiên liệu (đổ vào); Đa phương pháp; Làm sạch ống phân phối/đường ống có áp suất (bình xịt dịch vụ); Làm sạch bướm ga/cửa nạp; Khác
zh-TW: 燃油噴射清潔方式: 噴射器直接清潔 (測試台/超音波/轉接座); 油箱添加劑 (倒入式); 多種方法混合; 加壓油軌/管路清潔 (保養罐); 節氣門/進氣口清潔; 其他
en: Fuel injection cleaning method: Direct injector cleaning (bench/ultrasonic/adapter-based); In-tank additive (pour-in); Multi-method; Pressurized rail/line cleaning (service canister); Throttle body/intake cleaning; Other
ru: Метод очистки топливной системы впрыска: Прямая очистка форсунок (на стенде/ультразвуковая/через адаптер); Присадка в бак (заливная); Комбинированный метод; Очистка топливной рампы/магистрали под давлением (через промывочный баллон); Очистка дроссельной заслонки/впускного тракта; Другое
pt-BR: Método de limpeza do sistema de injeção de combustível: Limpeza do injetor direto (bancada/ultrassom/por adaptador); Aditivo no tanque (líquido); Multimétodo; Limpeza de linha/flauta pressurizada (recipiente de serviço); Limpeza do corpo de borboleta/admissão; Outro
ko: 연료 분사 장치 세척 방법: 직접 인젝터 세정(벤치/초음파/어댑터 기반); 연료탱크 내 첨가제(주입식); 다중 방식; 가압식 레일/라인 세정(서비스 캐니스터); 스로틀 바디/흡기 세정; 기타
lt-LT: Kuro įpurškimo valymo metodas: Tiesioginis purkštukų valymas (stendas / ultragarsas / adapteris); Priedas į baką (įpilamas); Kelių metodų; Slėginis magistralės / linijos valymas (aptarnavimo balionėlis); Droselinės sklendės / įsiurbimo trakto valymas; Kita
nb: Rengjøringsmetode for drivstoffinnsprøytning: Direkte injektorrens (benk/ultralyd/adapterbasert); Tilsetning i tanken (helles i); Flermetode; Trykksatt skinne-/linjerensing (servicebeholder); Gasspjeld-/inntaksrens; Annet
de: Reinigungsmethode der Kraftstoffeinspritzung: Direkte Injektorreinigung (Prüfstand/Ultraschall/Adapter); In-Tank-Additiv (zum Eingießen); Multi-Methode; Druckreinigung Kraftstoffverteilerrohr/-leitung (Service-Kanister); Reinigung der Drosselklappe/des Ansaugtrakts; Sonstige
zh-CN: 燃油喷射清洗方法: 直接喷油器清洗（工作台/超声波/适配器）; 油箱内添加剂（倾倒式）; 多种方法; 加压共轨/管路清洗（维修罐）; 节气门/进气道清洗; 其他
nl: Brandstofinjectie reinigingsmethode: Directe injectorreiniging (werkbank/ultrasoon/met adapter); Additief in tank (om in te gieten); Meerdere methoden; Reiniging onder druk van rail/leiding (servicebus); Reiniging van gasklephuis/inlaat; Anders
sl-SI: Metoda čiščenja vbrizgalnika goriva: Čiščenje direktnih injektorjev (na mizi/ultrazvočno/z adapterjem); Dodatek za v rezervoar (za vlivanje); Več metod; Čiščenje voda pod tlakom (servisna posoda); Čiščenje lopute za plin/sesalnega kolektorja; Drugo
bg-BG: Метод за почистване на впръскването на гориво: Директно почистване на инжектори (стенд/ултразвуково/с адаптер); Добавка за резервоар (за наливане); Комбиниран метод; Почистване на рейка/линия под налягане (сервизен флакон); Почистване на дроселова клапа/всмукателен колектор; Друго
fr: Méthode de nettoyage de l’injection de carburant: Nettoyage direct des injecteurs (banc/ultrasons/avec adaptateur); Additif pour réservoir (à verser); Méthodes multiples; Nettoyage sous pression de rampe/conduite (réservoir de service); Nettoyage du boîtier papillon/de l’admission; Autre
it: Metodo di pulizia dell'impianto di iniezione: Pulizia diretta iniettori (banco/ultrasuoni/adattatore); Additivo per serbatoio (da versare); Multimetodo; Pulizia linea/flauto in pressione (bombola di servizio); Pulizia corpo farfallato/aspirazione; Altro
th: วิธีการทำความสะอาดหัวฉีดน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: การล้างหัวฉีดโดยตรง (เครื่องล้าง/อัลตราโซนิก/ใช้อะแดปเตอร์); สารเติมแต่งในถัง (แบบเทลงไป); แบบหลายวิธี; การล้างราง/ท่อแรงดัน (กระป๋องบริการ); การล้างลิ้นปีกผีเสื้อ/ท่อไอดี; อื่นๆ